Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1097.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 38 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 17FAMILY RECOGNITIONSec.1701. Definitions (Reserved).1702. Family Day.§ 1701. Definitions (Reserved).§ 1702. Family Day.(a) Legislative findings and declarations.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Strong families are the cornerstone of this Commonwealth's moral, civic and economic life.(2) Family relationships nurture the character, well-12345678910111213141516171819 being and civic responsibility of children and adults and contribute directly to safe neighborhoods, successful schools and healthy communities.(3) Across the United States, several states have enacted or proclaimed observances recognizing the day following Thanksgiving as "Family Day," underscoring the essential relationship between strong families and strong communities.(4) Pennsylvania should encourage residents to devote time to strengthen family bonds through shared meals, service, worship, recreation and other activities that promote unity and mutual support.(5) Recognizing a voluntary Family Day will affirm the vital role of families in community life.(b) Family Day.--(1) The fourth Friday of November each year is designated as Family Day.(2) The Governor shall issue annually a proclamation encouraging residents of this Commonwealth to observe Family Day with activities that strengthen family bonds, including shared meals, volunteer service, worship and recreation, and by inviting schools, faith-based organizations and community institutions to promote family unity.(3) Family Day may not be a paid holiday and does not require the closure of State offices, political subdivisions, school districts, businesses or other institutions.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1097PN1328 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627